turku-src/stems/propernouns.lexc
 
LEXICON Prop
+австралий:+австралий   Prop ;  ! "(+avstra˙lij) $pp" 
австралий:австралий   Prop ;  ! "Australia Prop" 
+австрий:+австрий   Prop ;  ! "(+avstrij) $pp" 
+азий:+азий   Prop ;  ! "(+˙azij) $pp" 
азий:азий   Prop ;  ! "Aasia Prop" 
+аймет:+аймет   Prop ;  ! "(+ajmet) $pp" 
+албаний:+албаний   Prop ;  ! "(+alba˙nij) $pp" 
албаний:албаний   Prop ;  ! "Albania Prop" 
+алмакай:+алмакай   Prop ;  ! "(+almakaj) $pp" 
альп:альп   Prop ;  ! "Alpit Prop" 
+америка:+америка   Prop ;  ! "(+ame˙rika) $pp" 
америка:америк%^A   Prop ;  ! "Amerikka Prop" 
+англий:+англий   Prop ;  ! "(+˙anglij) $pp" 
англий:англий   Prop ;  ! "Englanti Prop" 
+арабий:+арабий   Prop ;  ! "(+ara˙bij) $pp" 
арабий:арабий   Prop ;  ! "Arabia Prop" 
+аргентина:+аргентина   Prop ;  ! "(+argenti˙na) $pp" 
аргентина:аргентин%^A   Prop ;  ! "Argentiina Prop" 
+ардаш:+ардаш   Prop ;  ! "(+ardaS) $pp" 
+арсланбык:+арсланбык   Prop ;  ! "(+arslanbYk) $pp" 
+атлантика:+атлантика   Prop ;  ! "(+atla˙ntika) $pp" 
атлантика:атлантик%^A   Prop ;  ! "Atlantti Prop" 
+афин:+афин   Prop ;  ! "(+afi˙n) $pp" 
афины:афины   Prop ;  ! "Ateena Prop" 
+африка:+африка   Prop ;  ! "(+a˙frika) $pp" 
африка:африк%^A   Prop ;  ! "Afrikka Prop" 
балтик:балтик   Prop ;  ! "Itämeri Prop" 
+бельгий:+бельгий   Prop ;  ! "(+be˙l<gij) $pp" 
бельгий:бельгий   Prop ;  ! "Belgia Prop" 
+болгарий:+болгарий   Prop ;  ! "(+bolga˙rij) $pp" 
болгарий:болгарий   Prop ;  ! "Bulgaria Prop" 
+бразилий:+бразилий   Prop ;  ! "(+brazi˙lij) $pp" 
бразилий:бразилий   Prop ;  ! "Brasilia Prop" 
+будапешт:+будапешт   Prop ;  ! "(+budape˙St) $pp" 
будапешт:будапешт   Prop ;  ! "Budapest Prop" 
+вак-сола:+вак-сола   Prop ;  ! "(+vak-sola) $pp" 
+варман:+варман   Prop ;  ! "(+varman) $pp" 
+варшава:+варшава   Prop ;  ! "(+varSa˙va) $pp" 
варшава:варшав%^A   Prop ;  ! "Varsova Prop" 
+василь-ола:+василь-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+vasil<-ola) $pp" 
+венгрий:+венгрий   Prop ;  ! "(+ve˙ngrij) $pp" 
венгрий:венгрий   Prop ;  ! "Unkari Prop" 
+виче:+виче   Prop ;  ! "(+vi˙Ce) $pp" 
виче:вич%^E   Prop ;  ! "Vjatka Prop" 
+германий:+германий   Prop ;  ! "(+germa˙nij) $pp" 
германий:германий   Prop ;  ! "Saksa Prop" 
+даря:+даря   Prop ;  ! "(+darA) $pp" 
+дунай:+дунай   Prop ;  ! "(+duna˙j) $pp" 
дунай:дунай   Prop ;  ! "Tonava Prop" 
+европа:+европа   Prop ;  ! "(+evro˙pa) $pp" 
европа:европ%^A   Prop ;  ! "Eurooppa Prop" 
+изикокуй:+изикокуй   Prop ;  ! "(+izikokuj) $pp" 
+израиль:+израиль   Prop ;  ! "(+izra˙il<) $pp" 
+изымарий:+изымарий   Prop ;  ! "(+izYmarij) $pp" 
+ильна-ола:+ильна-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+il<na-ola) $pp" 
+исландий:+исландий   Prop ;  ! "(+isla˙ndij) $pp" 
+испаний:+испаний   Prop ;  ! "(+ispa˙nij) $pp" 
испаний:испаний   Prop ;  ! "Espanja Prop" 
+италий:+италий   Prop ;  ! "(+italij) $pp" 
италий:италий   Prop ;  ! "Italia Prop" 
+йошкар-+ола:+йошкар-+ола   Prop ;  ! "(+joSka˙r-+ola˙) $pp" 
+йузбика:+йузбика   Prop ;  ! "(+jyzbika) $pp" 
+йылдырвика:+йылдырвика   Prop ;  ! "(+jYldYrvika) $pp" 
+каван-ер:+каван-ер   Prop ;  ! "(+kavan-er) $pp" 
+какшан:+какшан   Prop ;  ! "(+kakSa˙n) $pp" 
какшан:какшан   Prop ;  ! "(joki) Koks`aga Prop" 
+карелий:+карелий   Prop ;  ! "(+kare˙lij) $pp" 
карелий:карелий   Prop ;  ! "Karjala Prop" 
+кечамыш:+кечамыш   Prop ;  ! "(+keCamYS) $pp" 
+кикпай:+кикпай   Prop ;  ! "(+kikpaj) $pp" 
+китай:+китай   Prop ;  ! "(+kita˙j) $pp" 
китай:китай   Prop ;  ! "Kiina Prop" 
+кождемыр:+кождемыр   Prop ;  ! "(+koZdemYr) $pp" 
+кокла-лоҥго:+кокла-лоҥго   Prop ;  ! "(+kokla-loNgo) $pp" 
+кокшай:+кокшай   Prop ;  ! "(+kokSaj) $pp" 
+кокшар:+кокшар   Prop ;  ! "(+kokSar) $pp" 
коркашудыр:коркашудыр   Prop ;  ! "Otava Prop" 
+кугу-+какшан:+кугу-+какшан   Prop ;  ! "(+kugu-+kakSan) $pp" 
+кугу-+кокуй:+кугу-+кокуй   Prop ;  ! "(+kugu-+kokuj) $pp" 
+куж-нур:+куж-нур   Prop ;  ! "(+kuZ-nur) $pp" 
+курымзак:+курымзак   Prop ;  ! "(+kurYmzak) $pp" 
+кучывай:+кучывай   Prop ;  ! "(+kuCYvaj) $pp" 
+кушыл-соказа:+кушыл-соказа   Prop ;  ! "(+kySYl-sokaza) $pp" 
+лайыш-ола:+лайыш-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+lajYS-ola) $pp" 
+лапландий:+лапландий   Prop ;  ! "(+lapla˙ndij) $pp" 
ленинград:ленинград   Prop ;  ! "Leningrad Prop" 
+ленин-ола:+ленин-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+lenin-ola) $pp" 
+лепешкан:+лепешкан   Prop ;  ! "(+lepeSkan) $pp" 
+макаря:+макаря   Prop ;  ! "(+makarA) $pp" 
+макаря-ку:+макаря-ку   Prop ;  ! "(+makarA-ky) $pp" 
+мариэл:+мариэл   Prop ;  ! "(+mariE˙l) $pp" 
+маря:+маря   Prop ;  ! "(+marA) $pp" 
+менде:+менде   Prop ;  ! "(+mende) $pp" 
+менчыла:+менчыла   Prop ;  ! "(+menCYla) $pp" 
+мераҥ:+мераҥ   Prop ;  ! "(+meraN) $pp" 
+монар:+монар   Prop ;  ! "(+monar) $pp" 
+моско:+моско   Prop ;  ! "(+mosko˙) $pp" 
моско:моско   Prop ;  ! "Moskova Prop" 
+нидерландий:+нидерландий   Prop ;  ! "(+niderla˙ndij) $pp" 
нидерландий:нидерландий   Prop ;  ! "Alankomaat Prop" 
+новгород:+новгород   Prop ;  ! "(+no˙vgorod) $pp" 
+норвегий:+норвегий   Prop ;  ! "(+norve˙gij) $pp" 
+озаҥ:+озаҥ   Prop ;  ! "(+ozaN) $pp" 
+орымбор:+орымбор   Prop ;  ! "(+orYmbor) $pp" 
+ош-+виче:+ош-+виче   Prop ;  ! "(+oS-+viCe) $pp" 
+пайраш:+пайраш   Prop ;  ! "(+pajraS) $pp" 
+парнякай:+парнякай   Prop ;  ! "(+parnAkaj) $pp" 
+пекшик:+пекшик   Prop ;  ! "(+pekSik) $pp" 
+перме:+перме   Prop ;  ! "(+perme) $pp" 
+петербург:+петербург   Prop ;  ! "(+peterbu˙rg) $pp" 
+петырвор:+петырвор   Prop ;  ! "(+petYrvor) $pp" 
+питыр:+питыр   Prop ;  ! "(+pitYr) $pp" 
+польша:+польша   Prop ;  ! "(+po˙l<Sa) $pp" 
польша:польш%^A   Prop ;  ! "Puola Prop" 
+пошкырт:+пошкырт   Prop ;  ! "(+po˙SkYrt) $pp" 
+пӧкленде:+пӧкленде   Prop ;  ! "(+pOklende) $pp" 
+прибалтика:+прибалтика   Prop ;  ! "(+priba˙ltika) $pp" 
прибалтика:прибалтик%^A   Prop ;  ! "Baltia Prop" 
+пуевуд:+пуевуд   Prop ;  ! "(+pyevy˙d) $pp" 
пуевуд:пуевуд   Prop ;  ! "Buj Prop" 
+пунчер:+пунчер   Prop ;  ! "(+pynCer) $pp" 
+пурӧ:+пурӧ   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrO) $pp" 
+пурӧвуд:+пурӧвуд   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrOvy˙d) $pp" 
пурӧвуд:пурӧвуд   Prop ;  ! "Bir Prop" 
+пурӧ-ола:+пурӧ-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+pyrO-ola) $pp" 
+пылачок:+пылачок   Prop ;  ! "(+pYlaCok) $pp" 
+рига:+рига   Prop ;  ! "(+ri˙ga) $pp" 
рига:рига   Prop ;  ! "Riika Prop" 
+россий:+россий   Prop ;  ! "(+rossi˙j) $pp" 
россий:россий   Prop ;  ! "Venäjä Prop" 
+румыний:+румыний   Prop ;  ! "(+rumY˙nij) $pp" 
румыний:румыний   Prop ;  ! "Romania Prop" 
+сайтий:+сайтий   Prop ;  ! "(+sajtij) $pp" 
+санкт-+петербург:+санкт-+петербург   Prop ;  ! "(+sankt-+peterburg) $pp" 
+сия:+сия   Prop ;  ! "(+siA) $pp" 
+сия-ола:+сия-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+siA-ola) $pp" 
+суоми:+суоми   Prop ;  ! "(+su˙omi) $pp" 
+сувӧ:+сувӧ   Prop ;  ! "(+syvO) $pp" 
+сувыял:+сувыял   Prop ;  ! "(+syvYAl) $pp" 
+сундур:+сундур   Prop ;  ! "(+syndyr) $pp" 
+сымбыр-ола:+сымбыр-ола   Prop ;  ! "(+sYmbYr-ola) $pp" 
+таллинн:+таллинн   Prop ;  ! "(+ta˙llinn) $pp" 
+танып-вуд:+танып-вуд   Prop ;  ! "(+tanYp-vyd) $pp" 
+токтар:+токтар   Prop ;  ! "(+toktar) $pp" 
+тосындо:+тосындо   Prop ;  ! "(+tosYndo) $pp" 
+тӧлдӧ:+тӧлдӧ   Prop ;  ! "(+tOldO) $pp" 
+тӧҥгак:+тӧҥгак   Prop ;  ! "(+tONgak) $pp" 
+тӧргым:+тӧргым   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrgYm) $pp" 
+тӧргым-тур:+тӧргым-тур   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrgYm-tyr) $pp" 
+тӧрмет:+тӧрмет   Prop ;  ! "(+tOrmet) $pp" 
+тылчак:+тылчак   Prop ;  ! "(+tYlCak) $pp" 
+тымбай:+тымбай   Prop ;  ! "(+tYmbaj) $pp" 
+угарман:+угарман   Prop ;  ! "(+ugarma˙n) $pp" 
+у-корак:+у-корак   Prop ;  ! "(+u-korak) $pp" 
упе:уп%^E   Prop ;  ! "Ufa Prop" 
+упӧ:+упӧ   Prop ;  ! "(+ypO) $pp" 
+упӧ-вуд:+упӧ-вуд   Prop ;  ! "(+ypO-vyd) $pp" 
+упӧн:+упӧн   Prop ;  ! "(+ypOn) $pp" 
+финляндий:+финляндий   Prop ;  ! "(+finlA˙ndij) $pp" 
финляндий:финляндий   Prop ;  ! "Suomi Prop" 
+хазан:+хазан   Prop ;  ! "(+xazan) $pp" 
+хельсинки:+хельсинки   Prop ;  ! "(+xe˙l<sinki) $pp" 
хельсинки:хельсинки   Prop ;  ! "Helsinki Prop" 
+чарла:+чарла   Prop ;  ! "(+Carla˙) $pp" 
чарла:чарла   Prop ;  ! "(vanh.) JoSkar-Ola Prop" 
+чолкоп:+чолкоп   Prop ;  ! "(+Colkop) $pp" 
+чолман:+чолман   Prop ;  ! "(+Colman) $pp" 
чолман:чолман   Prop ;  ! "Kama Prop" 
+чорай:+чорай   Prop ;  ! "(+Coraj) $pp" 
+шавашар:+шавашар   Prop ;  ! "(+SavaSar) $pp" 
+шанчара:+шанчара   Prop ;  ! "(+SanCara) $pp" 
+швеций:+швеций   Prop ;  ! "(+Sve˙cij) $pp" 
швеций:швеций   Prop ;  ! "Ruotsi Prop" 
+шернур:+шернур   Prop ;  ! "(+Sernur) $pp" 
+шобашеҥер:+шобашеҥер   Prop ;  ! "(+SobaSeNer) $pp" 
шоктешудыр:шоктешудыр   Prop ;  ! "Seulaset Prop" 
+эжвуд:+эжвуд   Prop ;  ! "(+EZvyd) $pp" 
+элнет:+элнет   Prop ;  ! "(+Elne˙t) $pp" 
элнет:элнет   Prop ;  ! "Iletjoki Prop" 
+эстоний:+эстоний   Prop ;  ! "(+Esto˙nij) $pp" 
эстоний:эстоний   Prop ;  ! "Viro Prop" 
+эшым:+эшым   Prop ;  ! "(+ESYm) $pp" 
+юл:+юл   Prop ;  ! "(+Ul) $pp" 
юл:юл   Prop ;  ! "Volga Prop" 
+яран:+яран   Prop ;  ! "(+Aran) $pp" 
+ярмет:+ярмет   Prop ;  ! "(+Armet) $pp" 
